North Carolina, session 2025, SB168.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 20-141(b)(1), it shall be unlawful to operate a
vehicle in excess of 25 miles per hour on residential streets in Durham experiencing congestion,
as determined by the City of Durham's Transportation Department.
SECTION 2. This act applies only to the City of Durham.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*S168-v-1*